Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2595.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 10.73.090 and 1989 c 395 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) No petition or motion for collateral attack on a judgment and sentence in a criminal case may be filed more than ((one year))three years after the judgment becomes final if the judgment and sentence is valid on its face and was rendered by a court of competent jurisdiction.(2) For the purposes of this section, "collateral attack" means any form of postconviction relief other than a direct appeal. "Collateral attack" includes, but is not limited to, a personal restraint petition, a habeas corpus petition, a motion to vacate judgment, a motion to withdraw guilty plea, a motion for a new trial, and a motion to arrest judgment.(3) For the purposes of this section, a judgment becomes final on the last of the following dates:(a) The date it is filed with the clerk of the trial court;(b) The date that an appellate court issues its mandate disposing of a timely direct appeal from the conviction; or(c) The date that the United States Supreme Court denies a timely petition for certiorari to review a decision affirming the conviction on direct appeal. The filing of a motion to reconsider denial of certiorari does not prevent a judgment from becoming final.Sec. 2. RCW 10.73.120 and 1989 c 395 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:As soon as practicable after ((July 23, 1989))the effective date of this section, the department of corrections shall attempt to advise the following persons of the time limit specified in RCW 10.73.090 and 10.73.100: Every person who, on ((July 23, 1989))the effective date of this section, is serving a term of incarceration, probation, parole, or community supervision pursuant to conviction of a felony.Sec. 3. RCW 2.70.023 and 2025 c 226 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the office of public defense shall not provide direct representation of clients.(2) In order to protect and preserve client rights when administering the office's statutory duties to provide initial telephonic or video consultation services, managing and supervising attorneys of the office of public defense who meet applicable public defense qualifications may provide limited short-term coverage for the consultation services if office of public defense contracted counsel is unavailable to provide the consultation services. The office shall provide services in a manner consistent with the rules of professional conduct, chapter 42.52 RCW, and applicable policies of the office of public defense.(3) The office of public defense may facilitate and supervise placement of law clerks, externs, and interns with office of public defense contracted counsel, in a manner consistent with the Washington admission and practice rules, the rules of professional conduct, chapter 42.52 RCW, and applicable policies of the office of public defense.(4) Employees of the office of public defense may provide pro bono legal services in a manner consistent with the rules of professional conduct, chapter 42.52 RCW, and applicable policies of the office of public defense. The policies of the office of public defense must require that employees providing pro bono legal services obtain and provide to the office a written statement, signed by any pro bono client, acknowledging that:(a) The pro bono legal services are provided by the employee acting in the employee's personal capacity and not as an employee of the office of public defense; and(b) The state of Washington may not be held liable for any claim arising from the provision of pro bono legal services by the employees of the office of public defense.The office of public defense shall retain the written statements in a manner consistent with records relating to potential conflicts of interest.(5) The office of public defense shall provide public defense services for indigent persons qualified for appointed counsel in involuntary commitment cases under chapter 71.05 RCW at the request of the health care authority on behalf of a county, either directly or by contracting with persons admitted to practice law in this state or organizations that employ persons admitted to practice law in this state, using funds provided by the county pursuant to RCW 71.05.110.(6) The office of public defense may provide direct representation of indigent adult or juvenile offenders who have a right to counsel at state expense to prosecute or respond to a collateral attack pursuant to RCW 10.73.150 and 2.70.020(1)(b).--- END ---